Arkansas, session 2025, HB1372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 4, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
15-4-221. Encouragement of award of economic development funding to
new businesses and businesses that have been in operation for less than five
(5) years.
The Arkansas Economic Development Commission shall encourage that at
least five percent (5%) of funding budgeted for economic development
programs, including without limitation community development block grants, go
towards supporting organizations or programs:
(1) For individuals starting new businesses in this state; or
(2) That provide services to businesses established within the
previous five (5) years whose principal place of business is in this state.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. This act is effective
*MBM108*
01/31/2025 2:59:45 PM MBM108

HB1372
on and after January 1, 2027.



































01/31/2025 2:59:45 PM MBM108